New York, session 2025-2026, S2241.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 13 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 13. State and federal government agency cooperation. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section the term "state agency" shall mean (a) all 5 agencies and departments over which the governor has executive authori- 6 ty; and (b) all public benefit corporations, public authorities, boards, 7 and commissions, for which the governor appoints the chair, the chief 8 executive, or the majority of board members. 9 2. The governor shall not, through executive order or any other execu- 10 tive power, prevent or inhibit state agencies and their employees, 11 including law enforcement officers, from working with federal agencies 12 for the purposes of federal immigration enforcement, nor shall the 13 governor prohibit information gathering or other forms of assistance 14 that aids in such enforcement. 15 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 30-a to read 16 as follows: 17 § 30-a. Executive department limitations. 1. For the purposes of this 18 section the term "state agency" shall mean (a) all agencies and depart- 19 ments over which the governor has executive authority; and (b) all 20 public benefit corporations, public authorities, boards, and commis- 21 sions, for which the governor appoints the chair, the chief executive, 22 or the majority of board members. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04583-01-5 S. 2241 2 1 2. No state agency or its employees, including law enforcement offi- 2 cers, shall prevent or inhibit any collaboration with federal agencies 3 for the purposes of federal immigration enforcement. 4 § 3. Section 29-a of the executive law is amended by adding a new 5 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 6 5. No suspension shall include preventing or inhibiting state agencies 7 and their employees, including law enforcement officers, from working 8 with federal agencies for the purposes of federal immigration enforce- 9 ment. For the purposes of this subdivision the term "state agency" shall 10 mean (a) all agencies and departments over which the governor has execu- 11 tive authority; and (b) all public benefit corporations, public authori- 12 ties, boards, and commissions, for which the governor appoints the 13 chair, the chief executive, or the majority of board members. 14 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.